California, session 20252026, AB566.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known as the California Opt Me Out Act.SEC. 2. Section 1798.136 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1798.136. (a) (1) A business shall not develop or maintain a browser that does not include functionality configurable by a consumer that enables the browser to send an opt-out preference signal to businesses with which the consumer interacts through the browser.(2) The functionality required by paragraph (1) shall be easy for a reasonable person to locate and configure.(b) A business that develops or maintains a browser shall make clear to a consumer in its public disclosures how the opt-out preference signal works and the intended effect of the opt-out preference signal.(c) The California Privacy Protection Agency may adopt regulations as necessary to implement and administer this section.(d) A business that develops or maintains a browser that includes a functionality that enables the browser to send an opt-out preference signal pursuant to this section shall not be liable for a violation of this title by a business that receives the opt-out preference signal.(e) As used in this section:(1) “Browser” means an interactive software application that is used by consumers to locate, access, and navigate internet websites.(2) “Opt-out preference signal” means a signal that complies with this title and that communicates the consumer’s choice to opt out of the sale and sharing of the consumer’s personal information.(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that this act furthers the purposes and intent of the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020.